New Jersey, session 222, A243.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Department of Education, in consultation with the Office of Homeland Security and Preparedness, shall develop an online clearinghouse for school districts to exchange information regarding the availability of school security resources, including personnel and equipment, that they are able to make available to other school districts in the event of an emergency.  The clearinghouse shall: a. only be accessible to authorized school district employees; b.    allow a user to readily identify the resources that are available in school districts that are in a close proximity; and c.    be operational no later than one year following the effective date of this act. To facilitate the development of the clearinghouse, the department shall publish a list of resources that a school district may require in the event of different emergency situations. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.